Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-501.01
Biennial budget
authorized.

A city of the metropolitan class may
adopt biennial budgets for biennial periods if such budgets are provided for
by a city charter provision. For purposes of this section:

(1) Biennial budget means a budget that provides for a biennial
period to determine and carry on the city's financial and taxing affairs;
and

(2) Biennial period means the two fiscal years comprising
a biennium commencing in odd-numbered or
even-numbered years.

Laws 2000, LB 1116, § 2;

Laws 2010, LB779, § 16.